District of Columbia statutes.
3-1212.02

Members of boards abolished.

Members of boards or commissions abolished by section 1104 shall serve as members of the successor boards to which their functions are transferred until the expiration of their terms or the appointment of their successors, whichever occurs first.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1202, 33 DCR 729
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 26(a), 35 DCR 147

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3311.2.

References in Text

“Section 1104”, referred to near the beginning of the section, is § 1104 of D.C. Law 6-99, which repealed Chapters 12, 17, 18, and 22 of Title 2 Chapters 21, 23, 24, and 26 of Title 3, 2001 Ed. and §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343 [§§ 3-2901 to 3-2943, 2001 Ed.].